North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-76.2.
Proxies.

At or before the meeting for which the appointment is to be effective, a shareholder may cast or authorize the casting of a vote:

By filing with an officer authorized to tabulate votes a written appointment of a proxy which is signed by the shareholder.

By remote communication or authenticated electronic communication to an officer authorized to tabulate votes, whether or not accompanied by written instructions of the shareholder, of an appointment of a proxy.

The remote communication or authenticated electronic communication must set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the appointment is authorized by the shareholder. If it is reasonably concluded that the remote communication or authenticated electronic communication is valid, the inspectors of election or, if there are no inspectors, the other persons making that determination of validity shall specify the information upon which they relied to make that determination.

A proxy so appointed may vote on behalf of the shareholder, or otherwise participate, in a meeting by remote communication according to section 10-19.1-75.2 to the extent the shareholder appointing the proxy would have been entitled to participate by remote communication according to section 10-19.1-75.2 if the shareholder did not appoint the proxy.

A copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any purpose for which the original writing or transmission could be used if the copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction is a complete and legible reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.

An appointment of a proxy for shares held jointly by two or more shareholders is valid if signed or consented to by authenticated electronic communication by any one of the shareholders, unless the corporation receives from any of those shareholders written notice or authenticated electronic communication either denying the authority of that person to appoint a proxy or appointing a different proxy.

The appointment of a proxy is valid for eleven months, unless a longer period is expressly provided in the appointment. No appointment is irrevocable unless the appointment is coupled with an interest, including a security interest, in the shares or in the corporation. A shareholder who revokes a proxy is not liable in any way for damages, restitution, or other claim.

An appointment may be revoked at will, unless the appointment is coupled with an interest, in which case it may not be revoked except in accordance with the terms of an agreement, if any, between the parties to the appointment. Appointment of a proxy is revoked by the person appointing the proxy by:

Attending a meeting and voting in person;

Signing and delivering to an officer or to a duly authorized agent of the corporation either:

A writing stating the appointment of the proxy is revoked; or

A new appointment; or

Remote communication or by authenticated electronic communication, whether or not accompanied by written instructions of the shareholder, of:

A statement that the proxy is revoked; or

A new appointment.

Revocation in either manner provided in subdivision b or c of subsection 3 revokes all earlier proxy appointments and is effective:

When filed with an officer or with a duly authorized agent of the corporation; or

When the remote communication or the authenticated electronic communication is received by an officer or by the duly authorized agent of the corporation.

The death or incapacity of a person appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the authority of the proxy, unless written notice of the death or incapacity is received by an officer authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises authority under that appointment.

Unless the appointment specifically provides otherwise, if two or more persons are appointed as proxies for a shareholder:

Any one of them may vote the shares on each item of business in accordance with specific instructions contained in the appointment; and

If no specific instructions are contained in the appointment with respect to voting the shares on a particular item of business, the shares must be voted as a majority of the proxies determine. If the proxies are equally divided, the shares may not be voted.

Subject to section 10-19.1-76.3 and an express restriction, limitation, or specific reservation of authority of the proxy appearing on the appointment, the corporation may accept a vote or action by the proxy as the action of the shareholder. The vote of a proxy is final, binding, and not subject to challenge. However, the proxy is liable to the shareholder or beneficial owner for damages resulting from a failure to exercise the proxy or from an exercise of the proxy in violation of the authority granted in the appointment.

If a proxy is given authority by a shareholder to vote on less than all items of business considered at a meeting of shareholders, the shareholder is considered to be present and entitled to vote by the proxy for purposes of subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-74, only with respect to those items of business for which the proxy has authority to vote. A proxy who is given authority by a shareholder who abstains with respect to an item of business is considered to have authority to vote on the item of business for purposes of this subsection.

The remote communication or the authenticated electronic communication must set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the revocation or the new appointment was authorized by the shareholder.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 43; 1999, ch. 95, § 21; 2003, ch. 85, § 14; 2005, ch. 100, § 19; 2009, ch. 106, § 14.

10-19.1-76.3.
Acceptance of shareholder act by the corporation.

If the name or network signature signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the record name or data address of a shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith may accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, if the name or network signature signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name or data address of a shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith may accept the vote, consent waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an organization and the name or network signature signed purports to be that of an officer, manager, or agent of the organization;

The name or network signature signed purports to be that of an administrator, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name or network signature signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder, and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name or network signature signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney in fact of the shareholder, and if, the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Two or more persons hold the shares as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name or network signature signed purports to be the name or data address of at least one of the coholders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coholders.

The corporation may reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis to doubt the validity of the signature on it or the authority of the signatory to sign for the shareholder.

The corporation or its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section is not liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 44; 2005, ch. 100, § 20; 2019, ch. 94, § 10, effective August 1, 2019.

10-19.1-77.
Voting rights. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-19.1-78.
Voting list. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-19.1-79.
Voting of shares by organizations and legal representatives. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-19.1-80.
Proxies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-19.1-81.
Voting trusts.

Shares in a corporation may be transferred to a trustee pursuant to written agreement, for the purpose of conferring on the trustee the right to vote and otherwise represent the beneficial owner of those shares for a period not exceeding ten years, except that if the agreement is made in connection with an indebtedness of the corporation, the voting trust may extend until the indebtedness is discharged. Unless otherwise specified in the agreement, the voting trust may be terminated at any time by the beneficial owners of a majority of the voting power of the shares held by the trustee. A signed original of the agreement must be filed with the corporation.

When a voting trust agreement is signed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the identities of all owners of beneficial interests in the trust, together with the number and class of shares each transferred to the trust. The list must include each shareholder’s:

Physical mailing address, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s name; or

Authorized means of receipt for electronic transmissions, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s data address.

Unless otherwise provided in the trust agreement, if there are two or more trustees, the manner of voting is determined as provided in subsection 5 of section 10-19.1-73.2.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 45; 2019, ch. 94, § 11, effective August 1, 2019.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-35.

10-19.1-82.
Shareholder voting agreements.

A written agreement solely among persons who are then shareholders or subscribers for shares to be issued, relating to the voting of their shares, is valid and specifically enforceable by and against the parties to the agreement. The agreement may override the provisions of section 10-19.1-76.2 regarding proxies and is not subject to the provisions of section 10-19.1-73.2 regarding voting trusts.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 46.

10-19.1-83.
Shareholder control agreements.

A written agreement among the shareholders of a corporation and the subscribers for shares to be issued, relating to the control of any phase of the business and affairs of the corporation, its liquidation and dissolution, or the relations among shareholders of or subscribers to shares of the corporation is valid and specifically enforceable as provided in subsections 2 and 3. The agreement may also include as parties persons who are neither shareholders or subscribers.

A written agreement as described in subsection 1 which relates to the control of or the liquidation and dissolution of the corporation, the relations among the shareholders and subscribers, or any phase of the business and affairs of the corporation, including the management of its business, the declaration and payment of distributions, the election of directors or officers, the employment of shareholders and others by the corporation, or the arbitration of disputes, is valid and specifically enforceable, if the agreement is signed by all persons who, on the date the agreement first became effective, are then the shareholders of the corporation, whether or not the shareholders all have voting shares, and the subscribers for shares, whether or not voting shares, to be issued. A written agreement as described in subsection 1 may provide for its amendment through nonunanimous means.

The written agreement is enforceable by the persons described in subsection 1 who are parties to the agreement and is binding upon and enforceable against only the persons described in subsection 1 and other persons with knowledge of the existence of the agreement. A signed original of the written agreement must be filed with the corporation. The existence and location of a copy of the written agreement must be noted conspicuously on the face or back of each certificate for shares issued by the corporation and included in information sent to the holders of uncertificated shares according to subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-66. A shareholder, a beneficial owner of shares, or another person with a security interest in shares may obtain upon written demand a copy of the agreement from the corporation at the expense of the corporation.

If an agreement authorized by this section takes away from any person any of the authority and responsibility which that person would otherwise possess under this chapter, the effect of the agreement is also:

To relieve that person of liability imposed by law for acts and omissions in the possession or exercise of that authority and responsibility; and

To impose that liability on the person or persons possessing the authority and responsibility under the agreement.

A shareholder is not liable pursuant to subsection 4 by virtue of a shareholder vote, if the shareholder had no right to vote on the action.

This section does not apply to, limit, or restrict agreements otherwise valid, nor is the procedure set forth in this section the exclusive method of agreement among shareholders or between the shareholders and the corporation with respect to any of the matters described in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 47; 1999, ch. 95, § 22; 2001, ch. 112, § 8.

10-19.1-84.
Books and records — Inspection.

A corporation shall keep, at the corporation’s principal executive office or at another place or places within the United States determined by the board, a share register not more than one year old, containing the identities of each shareholder, in alphabetical or numerical order by class of shares showing the number and classes of shares held by each shareholder.

The list must include each shareholder’s:

Physical mailing address, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s name; or

Authorized means of receipt for electronic transmissions, if the identity of a shareholder on the list consists of the shareholder’s data address.

A record of shareholders may show both the shareholder’s name and data address.

A corporation shall also keep, at the corporation’s principal executive office or at another place or places within the United States determined by the board, a record of the dates on which certificated or uncertificated shares were issued.

A corporation shall keep, at its principal executive office or at another place or places within the United States determined by the board, and, if its principal executive office or any such other place is outside of this state, shall make available at its registered office or at its principal executive office within this state within ten days after receipt by an officer of the corporation of a written demand for them made by a person described in subsection 4 or 5, originals or copies of:

Records of all proceedings of shareholders for the last three years;

Records of all proceedings of the board for the last three years;

Its articles and all amendments currently in effect;

Its bylaws and all amendments currently in effect;

Financial statements required by section 10-19.1-85 and the financial statement for the most recent interim period prepared in the course of the operation of the corporation for distribution to the shareholders or to a governmental agency as a matter of public record;

Reports made to shareholders generally within the last three years;

A statement of the identities and usual business addresses of its directors and principal officers;

Voting trust agreements and beneficial interests owner’s list described in section 10-19.1-81;

Shareholder control agreements described in section 10-19.1-83; and

A copy of agreements, contracts, or other arrangements or portions of them incorporated by reference under subsection 8 of section 10-19.1-10.

A corporation shall keep appropriate and complete financial records.

A shareholder or a holder of a voting trust certificate of a corporation that is not a publicly held corporation has an absolute right, upon written demand, to examine and copy, in person or by a legal representative, at any reasonable time, and the corporation shall make available within ten days after receipt by an officer of the corporation of the written demand:

The share register; and

All records referred to in subsection 2.

A shareholder or a holder of a voting trust certificate of a corporation that is not a publicly held corporation has a right, upon written demand, to examine and copy, in person or by a legal representative, other corporate records at any reasonable time only if the shareholder, beneficial owner, or holder of a voting trust certificate demonstrates a proper purpose for the examination.

A shareholder, beneficial owner, or holder of a voting trust certificate of a publicly held corporation has, upon written demand stating the purpose and acknowledged or verified in the manner provided in chapter 44-06.1, a right at any reasonable time to examine and copy the corporation’s share register and other corporate records reasonably related to the stated purpose and described with reasonable particularity in the written demand upon demonstrating the stated purpose to be a proper purpose. The acknowledged or verified demand must be directed to the corporation at its registered office in this state or at its principal place of business.

For purposes of subsections 5 and 6, a “proper purpose” is one reasonably related to the person’s interest as a shareholder, beneficial owner, or holder of a voting trust certificate of the corporation.

On application of the corporation, a court in this state may issue a protective order permitting the corporation to withhold portions of the records of proceedings of the board for a reasonable period of time, not to exceed twelve months, in order to prevent premature disclosure of confidential information which would be likely to cause competitive injury to the corporation. A protective order may be renewed for successive reasonable periods of time, each not to exceed twelve months and in total not to exceed thirty-six months, for good cause shown. If a protective order is issued, the statute of limitations for any action which the shareholder, beneficial owner, or holder of a voting trust certificate might bring as a result of information withheld automatically extends for the period of delay. If the court does not issue a protective order with respect to any portion of the records of proceedings as requested by the corporation, it shall award reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, to the shareholder, beneficial owner, or holder of a voting trust certificate. This subsection does not limit the right of a court to grant other protective orders or impose other reasonable restrictions on the nature of the corporate records that may be copied or examined under this subsection and subsection 9 or the use or distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder, beneficial owner, or holder of a voting trust certificate.

A shareholder, beneficial owner, or holder of a voting trust certificate who has gained access under subsection 8 to any corporate record, including the share register, may not use, or furnish to another for use, the corporate record or a portion of the contents for any purpose other than a proper purpose. Upon application of the corporation, a court may issue a protective order or order other relief as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this subsection.

Copies of the share register and all records referred to in subsection 2, if required to be furnished under this section, must be furnished at the expense of the corporation. In all other cases, the corporation may charge the requesting party a reasonable fee to cover the expenses of providing the copy.

The records maintained by a corporation, including its share register, financial records, and minute books, may be retained on, or by means of, or be in the form of any information storage device or method, including, punched holes, printed, magnetized spots, microimages, or any one or more distributed or other electronic networks or databases provided the records are retained in written form or in another form that can be converted into written form within a reasonable time, is legible visually and whose contents are assembled by related subject matter to permit convenient use by people in the normal course of business. A corporation shall convert the records referred to in subsection 4 upon the request of a person entitled to inspect them, and the expense of the conversion shall be borne by the person who bears the expense of copying pursuant to subsection 10. A copy of the conversion is admissible in evidence, and must be accepted for all other purposes, to the same extent as the existing or original records would be if they were legible visually.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 31; 1995, ch. 103, § 28; 1999, ch. 95, § 23; 2005, ch. 100, § 21; 2007, ch. 101, § 19; 2011, ch. 334, § 1; 2011, ch. 87, § 19; 2019, ch. 94, §§ 12-14, effective August 1, 2019.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-51.

10-19.1-85.
Financial statements.

A corporation shall, upon the written request of a shareholder, prepare annual financial statements within one hundred eighty days after the close of the corporation’s fiscal year, including at least a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year and a statement of income for the fiscal year, prepared on the basis of accounting methods reasonable in the circumstances. The financial statements may be consolidated statements of the corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries.

If the statements are audited by a public accountant, each copy must be accompanied by a report setting forth the opinion of the accountant on the statements.

If these statements are not audited by a public accountant, each copy must be accompanied by a statement of the treasurer or other person in charge of the corporation’s financial records:

Stating the reasonable belief of the person that the financial statements were prepared in accordance with accounting methods reasonable in the circumstances;

Describing the basis of presentation; and

Describing any respects in which the financial statements were not prepared on a basis consistent with those prepared for the previous year.

Upon written request by a shareholder, a corporation shall furnish its most recent annual financial statements as required under subsection 1 no later than ten business days after receipt of a shareholder’s written request. “Furnish” for purposes of this subsection means that the corporation shall deliver or mail, postage prepaid, the financial statements to the address specified by the requesting shareholder.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 29; 1997, ch. 103, § 48.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-51.

10-19.1-85.1.
Equitable remedies for shareholders.

If a corporation or an officer or director of the corporation violates this chapter, a court in this state, in an action brought by a shareholder of the corporation, may grant equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances and award expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, to the shareholders.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 49.

10-19.1-86.
Actions by shareholders.

No action may be brought in this state by a shareholder in the right of a domestic or foreign corporation unless the plaintiff is a holder of record of shares or voting trust certificates at the time of the transaction of which the plaintiff complains, or the plaintiff’s shares or voting trust certificates thereafter devolved upon the plaintiff by operation of law from a person who was a holder of record at such time.

In any action thereafter instituted in the right of any domestic or foreign corporation by the holder or holders of record of shares of the corporation or voting trust certificates, the court having jurisdiction, upon final judgment and finding that the action was brought without reasonable cause, may require the plaintiff or plaintiffs to pay the parties named as defendant the reasonable expenses, including fees of attorneys, incurred by them in defense of such action.

In any action now pending or hereafter instituted or maintained in the right of any domestic or foreign corporation by the holder or holders of record of less than five percent of the outstanding shares of any class of the corporation or voting trust certificates, unless the shares or voting trust certificates so held have a market value in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, the corporation in whose right such action is brought is entitled at any time before final judgment to require the plaintiff or plaintiffs to give security for the reasonable expenses, including fees of attorneys, that may be incurred by it in connection with such action or may be incurred by other parties named as defendant for which it may become legally liable.

Market value must be determined on the date the plaintiff institutes the action or, in the case of an intervenor, on the date the intervenor becomes a party to the action.

The amount of the security may from time to time be increased or decreased, in the discretion of the court, upon showing that the security provided has or may become inadequate or is excessive.

The corporation has recourse to such security in such amount as the court having jurisdiction determines upon the termination of the action, whether or not the court finds the action was brought without reasonable cause.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1997, ch. 103, § 50.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-48.

10-19.1-87.
Rights of dissenting shareholders.

A shareholder of a corporation may dissent from, and obtain payment for the fair value of the shareholder’s shares in the event of, any of the following corporate actions:

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, an amendment of the articles that materially and adversely affects the rights or preferences of the shares of a dissenting shareholder in that it:

Alters or abolishes a preferential right of the shares;

Creates, alters, or abolishes a right in respect of the redemption of the shares, including a provision respecting a sinking fund for the redemption or repurchase of shares;

Alters or abolishes a pre-emptive right of the holder of the shares to acquire shares, securities other than shares, or rights to purchase shares or securities other than shares;

Excludes or limits the right of a shareholder to vote on a matter, or to accumulate votes, except as the right may be excluded or limited through the authorization or issuance of securities of an existing or new class or series with similar or different voting rights; or

Eliminates the right to obtain payment under this subdivision;

A sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition of property and assets of the corporation that requires shareholder approval under subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-104, but not including:

A disposition in dissolution described in subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-109;

A disposition pursuant to an order of a court; or

A disposition for cash on terms requiring that all or substantially all of the net proceeds of disposition be distributed to the shareholders in accordance with their respective interests within one year after the date of disposition;

A plan of merger to which the corporation is a constituent organization, except as provided in subsection 3 and except for a plan of merger adopted under section 10-19.1-100.1;

A plan of exchange, whether under this chapter or under its governing statute in the case of another organization, to which the corporation is a constituent organization as the corporation whose shares will be acquired by the acquiring organization, except as provided in subsection 3;

A plan of conversion adopted by a corporation; or

Any other corporate action taken pursuant to a shareholder vote with respect to which the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the board directs that dissenting shareholders may obtain payment for their shares.

A shareholder may not assert dissenters’ rights as to less than all of the shares registered in the name of the shareholder, unless the shareholder dissents with respect to all the shares that are beneficially owned by another person but registered in the name of the shareholder and discloses the name and address of each beneficial owner on whose behalf the shareholder dissents. In that event, the rights of the dissenter must be determined as if the shares as to which the shareholder has dissented and the other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders. The beneficial owner of shares who is not the shareholder may assert dissenters’ rights with respect to shares held on behalf of the beneficial owner, and must be treated as a dissenting shareholder under the terms of this section and section 10-19.1-88, if the beneficial owner submits to the corporation at the time of or before the assertion of the rights a written consent of the shareholder.

Unless the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the board otherwise provide, the right to obtain payment under this section does not apply to the shareholders of:

The surviving corporation in a merger with respect to shares of the shareholders that are not entitled to be voted on the merger and are not canceled or exchanged in the merger; or

The corporation whose shares will be acquired by the acquiring organization in a plan of exchange with respect to shares of the shareholders that are not entitled to be voted on the plan of exchange and are not exchanged in the plan of exchange.

The shareholders of a corporation who have a right under this section to obtain payment for their shares, or who would have the right to obtain payment for their shares absent the exception set for in subsection 6, do not have a right at law or in equity to have a corporate action described in subsection 1 set aside or rescinded, except when the corporate action is fraudulent with regard to the complaining shareholder or the corporation.

If a date is fixed according to subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-73.2 for the determination of shareholders entitled to receive notice of and to vote on an action described under subsection 1, only shareholders as of the date fixed and beneficial owners as of the date fixed who hold through shareholders, as provided in subsection 2, may exercise dissenters’ rights.

Notwithstanding subsection 1, the right to obtain payment under this section, other than in connection with a plan of merger adopted under section 10-19.1-100, is limited in accordance with the following provisions:

The right to obtain payment under this section is not available for the holders of shares of any class or series of shares that is listed on the New York stock exchange, the American stock exchange, nasdaq global market, or the nasdaq global select market.

The applicability of subdivision a is determined as of:

The record date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to receive notice of, and to vote at, the meeting of shareholders to act upon the corporate action described in subsection 1; or

The day before the effective date of corporate action described in subsection 1 if there is no meeting of shareholders.

Subdivision a is not applicable, and the right to obtain payment under this section is available pursuant to subsection 1, for the holders of any class or series of shares who are required by the terms of the corporate action described in subsection 1 to accept for such shares anything other than shares, or cash in lieu of fractional shares, of any class or any series of shares of the domestic or foreign corporation, or any other ownership interest of any other organization, that satisfies the standards set forth in subdivision a at the time the corporate action becomes effective.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 32; 1995, ch. 103, § 30; 1997, ch. 103, § 51; 1999, ch. 95, § 24; 2001, ch. 112, § 9; 2003, ch. 85, § 15; 2005, ch. 100, § 22; 2007, ch. 101, § 20; 2009, ch. 106, § 15.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-20-08, 10-20-11.